Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20168-2609
Consumer reporting agency; fee authorized; exceptions.

(1) A consumer reporting agency may charge a fee of three dollars for placing, temporarily lifting, or removing a security freeze placed under section 8-2603 unless:

(a) The consumer is a victim of identity theft; and

(b) The consumer provides the consumer reporting agency with a copy of an official police report documenting the identity theft.

(2) A consumer reporting agency shall reissue the same or a new personal identification number or password required under section 8-2605 one time without charge and may charge a fee of no more than five dollars for subsequent reissuance of the personal identification number or password.

Laws 2007, LB674, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB177, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB835, § 12.